Maryland, session 2025, HB0607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 42. PAREA GRANT PROGRAM.
18–4201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0607*

HOUSE BILL 607
(B) “PAREA” MEANS THE PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE
APPRAISAL.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE
APPRAISAL GRANT PROGRAM.
18–4202.
(A) THERE IS A PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL
GRANT PROGRAM IN THE COMMISSION.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) ASSIST IN CLOSING APPRAISAL GAPS THAT OCCUR IN
HISTORICALLY REDLINED NEIGHBORHOODS AND UNDERREPRESENTED
COMMUNITIES;
(2) AWARD GRANTS TO MINORITIES WHO RESIDE IN HISTORICALLY
REDLINED NEIGHBORHOODS AND UNDERREPRESENTED COMMUNITIES WITH THE
GOAL OF PURSUING PAREA; AND
(3) DIVERSIFY THE APPRAISAL FIELD.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.